Arkansas, session 2025, HB1776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-6-702, concerning definitions relating to
regional solid waste management districts and boards, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(17) "Host community" means the closest governmental unit as
measured along major access roads and highways that exercises zoning
authority encompassed within a twelve-mile radius of the proposed, current,
or expanded site of the solid waste landfill.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-6-706(a), concerning permits for solid
waste landfill and transfer station permits, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Before an application for a new permit or permit expansion is
submitted to the Division of Environmental Quality, an applicant for a solid
waste landfill permit or a transfer station permit shall obtain a certificate
*JMB104*
03/13/2025 8:33:18 AM JMB104

HB1776
of need from the regional solid waste management board that has jurisdiction
over the proposed site, with the exception of permits for landfills when a
private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill
solely for the disposal of waste generated by the industry or wastes of a
similar kind or character under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-
6-201 et seq.
(2) The division may deny any permit based upon the denial of a
certificate of need by any board.
(3) If, during the pendency of a permit application, more than
four (4) years passes from the date of issuance of the certificate of need,
then the applicant shall supplement the application with a current
certificate of need passed in the same manner as the certificate of need
submitted to the division with the initial application.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 8-6-706(b), concerning permits for solid
waste landfill and transfer station permits, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(3)(A) The applicant’s petition shall include a city council
resolution or quorum court minute order if a municipality is not the closest
governmental unit, regarding the host community’s decision.
(B) The city council resolution or quorum court minute
order shall be voted on at a regularly scheduled meeting of the city council
or quorum court if a municipality is not the closest governmental unit and
signed by either the mayor of the city or the county judge if a municipality
is not the closest governmental unit.











03/13/2025 8:33:18 AM JMB104